en: Accordion tuning: Concert pitch; Dry; Four voice double octave; Musette; Three voice musette; Three voice octave; Tremolo; Two voice octave; Two voice unison; Wet; Other
sl-SI: Uglaševanje harmonik: Komorni ton; Sinhrona; Štiriglasna dvojna oktava; Musette; Triglasna musette; Triglasna oktava; Tremolo; Dvoglasna oktava; Dvoglasno sozvočje; Asinhrona; Druga
nl: Afstemming accordeon: Stemtoon; Droog; Vierstemmig dubbel octaaf; Musette; Driestemmige musette; Driestemmig octaaf; Tremolo; Tweestemmig octaaf; Tweestemmige unisono; Nat; Andere
pt-PT: Afinação de acordeão: Afinação de concerto; Seco; Quatro vozes duas oitavas; Musette; Musette três vozes; Três vozes oitava; Tremolo; Duas vozes oitava; Duas vozes uníssono; Molhado; Outro
lt-LT: Akordeono derinimas: Pasirodymo tonas; Sausas; Keturi balsai dviguba oktava; Musette (musetė); Trijų balsų musetė; Trijų balsų oktava; Tremolo; Dviejų balsų oktava; Dviejų balsų unisonas; Šlapias; Kita
nb: Stemming av trekkspill: Konsertpitch; Tørr; Fire stemmer dobbel oktav; Musett; Trestemt musett; Trestemt oktav; Tremolo; Tostemt oktav; Tostemt unison; Våt; Annet
zh-TW: 手風琴調音: 標準音高; 乾式; 四聲部雙八度; 莫塞特舞曲; 三聲部莫塞特舞曲; 三聲部八度; 震音; 二聲部八度; 二聲部齊奏; 濕式; 其他
da: Stemning af harmonika: Koncertpitch; Tør; Dobbelt oktav med fire stemmer; Musette; Musette med tre stemmer; Oktav med tre stemmer; Tremolo; Oktav med to stemmer; Unison med to stemmer; Våd; Andet
cs: Ladění akordeonu: Koncertní; Suché; Čtyřhlasá dvojitá oktáva; Museta; Tříhlasá museta; Tříhlasá oktáva; Tremolo; Dvouhlasá oktáva; Dvouhlasé unisono; Mokré; Jiné
es: Afinación de acordeón: Tono de concierto; Seco; Doble octava de cuatro voces; Musette; Musette de tres voces; Octava de tres voces; Tremolo; Octava de dos voces; Unísono de dos voces; Húmedo; Otros
vi: Điều chỉnh đàn phong cầm: Nốt liên hệ làm mốc; Không ngọt; Bốn giọng đôi quãng tám; Kèn bễ; Kèn bễ ba giọng; Ba quãng tám giọng nói; Độ rung giọng; Hai quãng tám giọng nói; Hai giọng nói đồng thanh; Ướt; Khác
ko: 아코디언 튜닝: 콘서트 피치; 드라이; 4열 더블 옥타브; 뮤제트; 3열 뮤제트; 3열 옥타브; 트레몰로; 2열 옥타브; 2열 유니즌; 습식; 기타
tr: Akordeon akordu: Concert pitch; Sek; Dört sesli çift oktav; Musette; Üç sesli musette; Üç sesli oktav; Tremolo; İki sesli oktav; İki sesli unison; Nemli; Diğer
pl: Strojenie akordeonu: Standardowe strojenie; Sucha; Cztery głosy w podwójnej oktawie; Musette; Musette z trzema głosami; Oktawa z trzema głosami; Tremolo; Oktawa z dwoma głosami; Unisono z dwoma głosami; Mokra; Inne
zh-CN: 手风琴调音: 音乐会音高; 干; 四音双八度; 风笛; 三音风笛; 三音八度; 颤音; 双音八度; 双音同度; 湿润; 其他
hu: Harmonika hangolása: Koncerthelyszín; Száraz; Négyszólamú kettős oktáv; Kis oboa; Háromszólamú kis oboa; Háromszólamú oktáv; Tremoló; Kétszólamú oktáv; Kétszólamú unisono; Nedves; Egyéb
th: การปรับเสียงหีบเพลง: ระดับเสียงสำหรับคอนเสิร์ต; ไม่หวาน; สี่เสียงสองอ็อคเตฟ; มูเซ็ต; มูเซ็ตสามเสียง; อ็อคเตฟสามเสียง; เทรโมโล; อ็อคเตฟสองเสียง; ยูนิซันสองเสียง; เปียก; อื่นๆ
sv: Stämning av dragspel: Normalton; Torrt; Fyrstämmig dubbeloktav; Musette; Trestämmig musette; Trestämmig oktav; Tremolo; Tvåstämmig oktav; Tvåstämmig unison; Våt; Övrigt
el: Κούρδισμα ενός ακορντεόν: Συχνότητα αναφοράς; Ξηρό κούρδισμα; Κούρδισμα τεσσάρων φωνών με διπλές οκτάβες; Κούρδισμα Musette; Κούρδισμα Musette τριών φωνών; Κούρδισμα τριών φωνών σε οκτάβα; Τρέμολο; Κούρδισμα δύο φωνών σε οκτάβα; Κούρδισμα δύο φωνών σε ταυτοφωνία; Υγρό κούρδισμα; Άλλο
bg-BG: Настройка на акордеон: Концертен терен; Сухо; Четиригласна двойна октава; Мюзета; Тригласна мюзета; Тригласна октава; Тремоло; Двугласна октава; Двугласен унисон; Мокро; Други
ro-RO: Acordare acordeon: Diapazon de concert; Acțiune simplă; Octavă dublă pe patru voci; Musette; Musette pe trei voci; Octavă pe trei voci; Tremolo; Octavă pe două voci; Unison pe două voci; Umed; Altele
pt-BR: Afinação do acordeão: Afinação de concerto; Seco; Quatro vozes dupla oitava; Musette; Musette a três vozes; Três oitavas; Tremolo; Duas oitavas; Uníssono a duas vozes; Úmido; Outro
fi: Harmonikan viritys: Kamariviritys; Kuiva; Neliääninen kaksioktaavinen; Pieni säkkipilli; Kolmiääninen pieni säkkipilli; Kolmiääninen yksioktaavinen; Tremolo; Kaksiääninen yksioktaavinen; Kaksiääninen yksiääninen; Kostea; Muu
sk-SK: Ladenie akordeónu: Koncertné ladenie; Suchý; Štvorhlasná dvojoktáva; Musette; Trojhlasný musette; Trojhlasná oktáva; Tremolo; Dvojhlasná oktáva; Dvojhlasný súzvuk; Mokrý; Iné
de: Akkordeon-Stimmung: Kammerton; Trocken; Vierstimmige Doppeloktave; Musette; Dreistimmige Musette; Dreistimmige Oktave; Tremolo; Zweistimmige Oktave; Zweistimmiges Unisono; Feucht; Sonstiges
ja: アコーディオンの調律: コンサートピッチ; ドライ; 4ヴォイスダブルオクターブ; ミュゼット; 3ヴォイスミュゼット; 3ヴォイスオクターブ; トレモロ; 2ヴォイスオクターブ; 2ヴォイスユニゾン; ウェット; その他
fr: Accordage de l’accordéon: Diapason de concert; Sec; Double octave à quatre voix; Musette; Musette à trois voix; Octave à trois voix; Trémolo; Octave à deux voix; Unisson à deux voix; Humide; Autre
hr-HR: Ugađanje harmonike: Komorni ton; Originalni zvuk; Četveroglasna dvostruka oktava; Musette registar; Troglasna musette; Troglasna oktava; Tremolo; Dvoglasna oktava; Dvoglasno unisono; Reverberirani zvuk; Ostalo
ru: Тип настройки аккордеона: Концертный строй; Сухой; Четыре голоса, двойная октава; Мюзет; Трехголосный мюзет; Третья октава; Тремоло; Вторая октава; Двухголосный унисон; С реверберацией; Другое
it: Accordatura della fisarmonica: Intonazione del concerto; Secco; Doppia ottava a quattro voci; Musette; Musette a tre voci; Ottava a tre voci; Tremolo; Ottava a due voci; Unisono a due voci; Bagnato; Altro